Washington statutes.
RCW 38.12.125

Officer promotion board—Composition.

The officer promotion board shall be composed as follows:

(1) For promotions of army national guard officers, the adjutant general must appoint a board that includes at least five voting members who are officers in the army national guard senior in grade to those officers being considered by the board for promotion.

(a) Any officer appointed to the board who is not senior in grade to officers being considered for promotion must be recused from participating in the consideration for promotion of those officers to whom he or she is not senior.

(b) For consideration of an officer for promotion to the grade of O5 and above, the board must include at least one general officer appointed by the adjutant general as a voting member.

(2) For promotions of air national guard officers, the adjutant general must appoint a board that includes at least five voting members who are officers in the air national guard senior in grade to those officers being considered by the board for promotion.

(a) Any officer appointed to the board who is not senior in grade to officers being considered for promotion must be recused from participating in the consideration for promotion of those officers to whom he or she is not senior.

(b) For consideration of an officer for promotion to the grade of O5 and above, the board must include at least one general officer appointed by the adjutant general as a voting member.

(3) For promotions of state guard officers, the adjutant general must appoint a board that includes at least five voting members who are officers in the state guard senior in grade to those officers being considered by the board for promotion.

(a) Any officer appointed to the board who is not senior in grade to officers being considered for promotion must be recused from participating in the consideration for promotion of those officers to whom he or she is not senior.

(b) For consideration of an officer for promotion to the grade of O5 and above, the board must include at least one general officer appointed by the adjutant general as a voting member.

[ 2014 c 178 s 1; 1989 c 19 s 18; 1974 ex.s. c 34 s 4.]